Utah statutes.
63J-4-503.   Planning coordinator responsibilities.

(1)  The state planning coordinator shall:

(a)  administer this part;

(b)  subject to the direction and approval of the governor, take necessary action for its implementation; and

(c)  inform political subdivision representatives, in advance, of all committee meetings.

(2)  The state planning coordinator may delegate the state planning coordinator's responsibilities under this part to the Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office.

